Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2595.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. Interconnection reviews.(a) Affirmative duty.--An electric distribution company, when reviewing an interconnection application submitted by an interconnection customer under 52 Pa. Code Ch. 75 Subch. C (relating to interconnection standards), shall determine at a scoping meeting whether one of the following is required and shall enter into an agreement with the interconnection customer 1234567891011121314151617181920 for:(1) an interconnection feasibility study;(2) an interconnection impact study; or(3) an interconnection facilities study.(b) Result deadline.--If the electric distribution company determines a study is required under subsection (a), the electric distribution company shall provide the results of the study to the interconnection customer as follows:(1) no later than 15 90 days after both parties sign an interconnection feasibility study agreement; or(2) no later than 60 90 days after both parties sign an interconnection impact study agreement or an interconnection facilities study agreement.(C) AGREEMENT.--UPON COMPLETION OF AN INTERCONNECTION STUDY, AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH THE INTERCONNECTION CUSTOMER TO COMPLETE ANY DISTRIBUTION UPGRADES NECESSARY FOR INTERCONNECTION AS DETERMINED IN THE INTERCONNECTION STUDY, INCLUDING A TIMELINE FOR COMPLETION AND COST ESTIMATES SUBJECT TO REVIEW AND APPROVAL BY THE COMMISSION.(D) DISPUTE RESOLUTION.--(1) IF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY FAILS TO COMPLETE THE DISTRIBUTION UPGRADES IN A TIMELY MANNER AND REASONABLY WITHIN THE COST ESTIMATES PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE AGREEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C), THE INTERCONNECTION CUSTOMER MAY PURSUE RESOLUTION THROUGH THE DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS UNDER 52 PA. CODE § 75.51 (RELATING TO DISPUTES).(2) A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ENFORCEMENT BY THE COMMISSION UNDER 66 PA.C.S. CH. 33 (RELATING TO VIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES).(c) (E) Applicability.--This section shall apply to an 20260HB2595PN3631 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interconnection application submitted on or after the effective date of this subsection.(F) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "DISTRIBUTION UPGRADE" MEANS A REQUIRED ADDITION OR MODIFICATION TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY'S ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM AT OR BEYOND THE POINT OF INTERCONNECTION. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE INTERCONNECTION FACILITIES.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2595PN3631 - 3 - <--12345678